North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 3. Articles of Incorporation and Bylaws.

§ 55A-10-30.
Approval by third persons.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may require an amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws to be approved in writing by a specified person or persons other than the board of directors. Such a provision in the articles of incorporation or bylaws may only be amended with the approval in writing of such person or persons.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1995, c. 509, s. 30.

North Carolina Commentary

Former Chapter 55A did not expressly authorize a corporation to condition an amendment to the articles of incorporation or bylaws on approval by third persons.